Utah statutes.
62A-3-314.   Private right of action -- Estate asset -- Attorney fees.
(1)  A vulnerable adult who suffers harm or financial loss as a result of
exploitation has a private right of action against the perpetrator.
(2)  Upon the death of a vulnerable adult, any cause of action under this
section shall constitute an asset of the estate of the vulnerable adult.
(3)  If the plaintiff prevails in an action brought under this section, the
court may order that the defendant pay the costs and reasonable attorney fees
of the plaintiff.
(4)  If the defendant prevails in an action brought under this section, the
court may order that the plaintiff pay the costs and reasonable attorney fees
of the defendant, if the court finds that the action was frivolous,
unreasonable, or taken in bad faith.
